Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.040

Effect of conveyance pursuant to order of sale.

A conveyance made in pursuance of a sale ordered by the court, shall pass to the grantee the title of all the parties to the action or proceeding.

[Code 1881 s 531; 1877 p 112 s 535; 1854 p 205 s 393; RRS s 608.]